North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Part 2. County Societies.

§ 106-505.
Incorporation; powers and term of existence.

Any number of resident persons, not less than 10, may associate together in any county, under written articles of association, subscribed by the members thereof, and specifying the object of the association to encourage and promote agriculture, domestic manufactures, and the mechanic arts, under such name and style as they may choose, subject to any other applicable provisions of law, and thereby become a body corporate with all the powers incident to such a body, and may take and hold such property, both real and personal, as may be needful to promote the objects of their association.

Whenever any such association is formed subsequent to April 1, 1949, a copy of the articles of incorporation shall be filed with the Secretary of State, together with any other information the Secretary of State may require. A fee of ten dollars ($10.00) shall be paid to the Secretary of State when such articles are filed. Upon receipt of such articles in proper form, and such other information as may be required, and the filing fee, the Secretary of State shall issue a charter of incorporation.

The corporate existence shall continue as long as there are 10 members, during the will and pleasure of the General Assembly.

History.

1852, c. 2, ss. 1, 2, 3; R.C., c. 2, ss. 6, 7; Code, s. 2220; Rev., ss. 3868, 3869; C.S., s. 4941; 1949, c. 829, s. 2.

§ 106-506.
Organization; officers; new members.

Such society shall be organized by the appointment of a president, two vice-presidents, a secretary and treasurer, and such other officers as they may deem proper, who shall thereafter be chosen annually, and hold their places until others shall be appointed. And the society may from time to time, on such conditions as may be prescribed, receive other members of the corporation.

History.

1852, c. 2, s. 3; R.C., c. 2, s. 7; Code, s. 2221; Rev., s. 3869; C.S., s. 4942.

§ 106-507.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-316, s. 5(d), effective January 1, 2014, and applicable to admissions purchased on or after that date.

History.

1905, c. 513, s. 2; Rev., s. 3871; C.S., s. 4944; 1935, c. 371, s. 107; 1949, c. 829, s. 2; 1973, c. 476, s. 193; repealed by 2013-316, s. 5(d), effective January 1, 2014; as amended by 2014-3, s. 5.1.

§ 106-508.
Funds to be used in paying premiums.

All moneys so subscribed, as well as that received from the State treasury as herein provided, shall after paying the necessary incidental expenses of such society, be annually paid for premiums awarded by such societies, in such sums and in such way and manner as they severally, under their bylaws, rules and regulations, shall direct, on such live animals, articles of production, and agricultural implements and tools, domestic manufacturers, mechanical implements, tools and productions as are of the growth and manufacture of the county or region, and also such experiments, discoveries, or attainments in scientific or practical agriculture as are made within the county or region wherein such societies are respectively organized.

History.

1852, c. 2, s. 7; R.C., c. 2, s. 9; Code, s. 2223; Rev., s. 3873; C.S., s. 4945; 1949, c. 829, s. 2.

§ 106-509.
Annual statements to State Treasurer.

Each agricultural society entitled to receive money from the State Treasurer shall, through its treasurer, transmit to the Treasurer of the State, in the month of December or before, a statement showing the money received from the State, the amount received from the members of the society for the preceding year, the expenditures of all such sums, and the number of the members of such society.

History.

1852, c. 2, s. 8; R.C., c. 2, s. 10; Code, s. 2224; Rev., s. 3874; C.S., s. 4946.

§ 106-510.
Publication of statements required.

Each agricultural society receiving money from the State under this Chapter shall, in each year, publish at its own expense a full statement of its experiments and improvements, and reports of its committees, in at least one newspaper in the State; and evidence that the requirements of this Chapter have been complied with shall be furnished to the State Treasurer before he shall pay to such society the sum of fifty dollars ($50.00) for the benefit of such society for the next year.

History.

1852, c. 2, s. 9; R.C., c. 2, s. 11; Code, s. 2225; Rev., s. 3875; C.S., s. 4947.

§ 106-511.
Records to be kept; may be read in evidence.

The secretary of such society shall keep a fair record of its proceedings in a book provided for that purpose, which may be read in evidence in suits wherein the corporation may be a party.

History.

1852, c. 2, s. 5; R.C., c. 2, s. 12; Code, s. 2226; Rev., s. 3876; C.S., s. 4948.